DI-236

DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLESTABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DIARH-01

DTC

C1231/31,C1335/35 | Steering Angle Sensor Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

DTC No.

DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1231/ 31

Detectionofany ofconditions  1.through3.:

1.Whenthe conditionthat ECU terminal IG 1 voltageis 9.9
V or more, and does not receive a data from steering
angle sensorcontinuesfor 1 sec.ormore.

2.Whenthe steeringangle sensor value changes by 360
ormore with SSC signal from steering angle sensor « Steering angle sensor
remaining ON or OFF. « Steering angle sensor circuit

3. When the condition that difference between the steering
angle value at edge occurring in SSC signal and the
value at edge occurring in SSC signal after turning the
steeringwheelone -turnisoutoftherangefrom355.5
-364.5° occurs 10times ormore.

C1335/35

Whenthe ECUIG 1 terminalvoltageis9.5V or more, data
transmission fromthe steering angle sensoris impossible
for 1 sec.ormore.

« Steering angle sensor
« Steering angle sensor circuit
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:
Starttheinspectionfromstep 1 incaseofusingthehand -heldtesterand startfromstep2incase of not
usingthehand -heldtester.

1 Checkoutputvalue ofthe steering angle sensor.

PREPARATION:

(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(b) Turntheignition switch ON and push the hand -heldtester main switch ON.
(c) Selectthe DATALIST mode onthe hand -heldtester.

CHECK:

Check that the steering wheel turning angle value of the steering angle position sensor displayed on the
hand-heldtesteris changing whenturning the steeringwheel.

HINT:

After certifying ”Zero” point of the steering angle sensor (Speed: 35 km/h, driving straight ahead for 10sec.
or more), the value will change.

OK:

Steering wheel turning angle value must be changing.

0K> Go to step 5.
NG \

2 [ Check input voltage of the steering angle sensor.

PREPARATION:

Remove the column lower cover.

CHECK:

(@  Turn the ignition switch ON.

(b) Measure voltage betweenterminal 1 and2,2and9ofthe
combination switch wire harness side connector.

OK:
Voltage: 10 -14V

ESS(-) IG (+)

F17609
NG> Check and replace harness and connector.
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3 | Check steering angle sensor.

LOCK PREPARATION:
< (@) Remove the steering wheel lower No. 2 and No. 3 covers,
\\) 5 steering wheel pad, steering wheel column upper and
lower covers (See Pub.No.RM6 16EonpageSR -13or
3@ SR-29).
Fﬁ (b) Disconnect the combination switch connector (for steer-
(+) (2 ing angle sensor).
() Connect the oscilloscope to the terminals 3 and 6 of the
(Oscilloscope) F03003 combination switch connector (for steering angle sensor).
(d) Apply battery voltage betweenterminals 1 and 2.
CHECK:
Turns the steering wheel slowly and check the signal waveform.
OK:
(Reference)
5V
oV [ —

e
- | 2,288 us
oV _|_|_|_|—|_ ru—l

#« 104 us

F04441

HINT:

The above signal waveform does not repeat ON and OFF regu-
larly and this combination changes case by case according to
the data.

NG> Replace steering angle sensor.

OK

4 [ Check that slits of the steering sensor disc are clogged up.

NG> Repair or replace steering sensor disc.
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5 [ Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between steering
position sensor and skid control ECU (See page IN-38).

NG

Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—

Check and replace skid control ECU.
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